Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW to read as follows:The department shall have up to three biennia to balance professional license accounts if, due to an error by the department, an increase in licensing fees of more than 33 percent would be required to balance a professional licensing account within the current biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.140 RCW to read as follows:(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this section, the department shall examine its records to identify every individual who was required to pay a fee in excess of a 33 percent increase to the department that was imposed to balance the real estate appraiser commission account due to an error by the department within the last 12 months.(2) The department shall issue a one-time refund of the excess fee to every individual identified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section within 30 days.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---